Illinois, session 104th, HB3051.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Mental Health and Developmental 5Disabilities Administrative Act is amended by adding Section 654.3 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 1705/54.3 new)8    Sec. 54.3. Access to rural developmental disabilities 9services.10    (a) Definitions. As used in this Section: 11    "Facility" means a center or program that provides 12developmental disabilities services and is not owned or 13operated by the State or any political subdivision. 14    "Rural provider" means a facility that provides 15developmental disability services located in a rural area that 16is at least 35 miles drive away from any other rural provider, 17hospital, or other location that provides developmental 18disability services. 19    (b) Transportation support. The Department shall adopt 20rules governing rural provider compensation. Such rules shall 21increase the rate of compensation for rural providers that 22account for significant challenges or barriers related to 23transportation, including, but not limited to, travel time of   HB3051- 2 -LRB104 11138 KTG 21220 b1over one hour each way or 35 or more miles, and last minute 2appointment cancellations. Specifically, the rate of 3reimbursement shall be increased and compensate rural 4providers for: (i) extended travel time and mileage and (ii) 5staff or resources required to provide developmental 6disabilities services to individuals in rural areas.7    (c) Innovative technology support. The Department shall 8create a grant program to incentivize and support the use of 9assistive technologies and innovative services to increase 10access to developmental disabilities services provided by 11rural providers. Such assistive technologies and innovative 12services include, but are not limited to, telehealth, remote 13patient monitoring, and other technologies and services that 14would increase access to care by removing certain barriers for 15individuals living in rural communities and needing 16developmental disabilities services.